District of Columbia statutes.
42-3671.06

Prohibited practices.

A lease-purchase agreement shall not contain:

(1)

A confession of judgment;

(2)

A negotiable instrument;

(3)

A security interest or any other claim of a property interest in any goods except those goods delivered by the lessor under the lease-purchase agreement;

(4)

A wage assignment;

(5)

A waiver by the consumer of claims or defenses; or

(6)

A provision authorizing the lessor, or the lessor’s agent, to enter upon the consumer’s premises or to commit any breach of the peace in the repossession of goods.

Apr. 13, 2002, D.C. Law 14-99, § 7, 49 DCR 1000